District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.38

Voting of shares — Place of meetings; special meetings; use of conference telephone.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 174, ch. 269, § 38
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-24, § 3, 28 DCR 2618
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.38.
1981 Ed., § 29-338.
1973 Ed., § 29-916f.

Prior Codifications